Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH PROFESSIONS

SUBTITLE B. PHYSICIANS

CHAPTER 166. BILLING OF ANATOMIC PATHOLOGY SERVICES

Sec. 166.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "anatomic pathology services" means:

(1) histopathology or surgical pathology, which is the gross and microscopic examination and histologic processing of organ tissue performed by a physician or under the supervision of a physician;

(2) cytopathology, which is the microscopic examination of cells from the following:

(A) fluids;

(B) aspirates;

(C) washings;

(D) brushings; or

(E) smears, including a Pap smear, performed by a physician or under the supervision of a physician;

(3) hematology, which is the microscopic evaluation of bone marrow aspirates and biopsies performed by a physician, or under the supervision of a physician, and peripheral blood smears when the attending or treating physician or technologist requests that a blood smear be reviewed by a pathologist;

(4) sub-cellular pathology and molecular pathology; or

(5) a blood-banking service performed by a pathologist.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 144 (S.B. 1832), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 166.002. ANATOMIC PATHOLOGY BILLING. Notwithstanding any other law, a person, including a physician and an entity, violates this subtitle and is subject to disciplinary action and penalties under this subtitle if the person:

(1) does not directly supervise or perform anatomic pathology services for a patient; and

(2) fails to disclose in the bill presented by the person to the patient or the insurer or other third party payor, or in an itemized statement to the patient:

(A) the name and address of the physician or laboratory that provided the anatomic pathology services; and

(B) the net amount paid or to be paid for each anatomic pathology service provided to the patient by the physician or laboratory.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 144 (S.B. 1832), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.